South Dakota, session 2026, HB1128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-5B-2 be AMENDED:
32-5B-2. Motor vehicles exempted from the provisions of this chapter are as
follows:
(1) Any motor vehicle exempted in § 32-5-1.3, 32-5-42, 32-5-42.1, or 32-5-42.2;
(2) Any motor vehicle acquired by inheritance from or bequest of a decedent;
(3) Any motor vehicle previously titled or licensed jointly in the names of two or more
persons and subsequently transferred without consideration to one or more of such
the persons;
(4) Any motor vehicle transferred without consideration between spouses, between a
parent and child, and between siblings;
(5) Any motor vehicle transferred pursuant to any mergers or consolidations of
corporations or limited liability companies consolidation or merger of a corporation
or limited liability company, or plans of reorganization by which substantially all of
the assets of a corporation or limited liability company are transferred, if the motor
vehicle was previously titled, licensed, and registered in this state;
(6) Any motor vehicle transferred by a subsidiary corporation or limited liability
company to its parent corporation or limited liability company for no or nominal
consideration, or in sole consideration of the cancellation or surrender of the
subsidiary's stock if, provided that the motor vehicle was previously titled, licensed,
and registered in this state;
(7) Any motor vehicle transferred:
(a) Transferred between an:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.591.9 2 1128
(i) An individual and a corporation, if the individual and the owner of
the majority of the capital stock of the corporation are one and the
same, or any motor vehicle transferred between an; or
(ii) An individual and a limited liability company, if the individual and the
majority member of the limited liability company are one and the
same, and if the motor vehicle; and
(b) Which was previously titled, licensed, and registered in this state;
(8) Any motor vehicle transferred between a corporation or limited liability company
and its stockholders, members, or creditors if to:
(a) To effectuate a dissolution of the corporation or limited liability company, it
is necessary to transfer the title from the corporate entity or limited liability
company to the stockholders, members, or creditors; and if the
(b) The motor vehicle was previously titled, licensed, and registered in this
state;
(9) Any motor vehicle transferred between an individual and a limited or general
partnership if the:
(a) The individual and the owner of the majority interest in the partnership are
one and the same person; and if the
(b) The motor vehicle was previously titled, licensed, and registered in this
state;
(10) Any motor vehicle transferred to effect effectuate a sale of all or substantially all
of the assets of the business entity, if the motor vehicle was previously titled,
licensed, and registered in this state;
(11) Any motor vehicle acquired by a secured party or lien holder in satisfaction of a
debt;
(12) Any motor vehicle sold or transferred that, which is eleven or more model years
old and that is sold or transferred for two thousand five hundred dollars or less
before trade-in;
(13) Any damaged motor vehicle transferred to an insurance company in the settlement
of an insurance claim;
(14) Any motor vehicle owned by a former resident of this state who returns to the state
and who had previously paid vehicle excise tax to this state on the motor vehicle,
as evidenced within the department's records or by submission of other acceptable
proof of payment of such the tax;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.591.9 3 1128
(15) Any motor vehicle transferred between corporations, both subsidiary and
nonsubsidiary, if the:
(a) The individuals who hold a majority of stock in the first corporation also
hold a majority of stock in the second corporation; but these, except that
the individuals need not hold the same ratio of stock in both corporations,
and if the
(b) The motor vehicle was previously titled, licensed, and registered in this
state;
(16) Any motor vehicle transferred between limited liability companies, both subsidiary
and nonsubsidiary, if the:
(a) The individuals who hold a majority interest in the first limited liability
company also hold a majority interest in the second limited liability
company; and if the
(b) The motor vehicle was previously titled, licensed, and registered in this
state;
(17) Any motor vehicle transferred by a trustor to a trustee or from a trustee to a
beneficiary of a trust;
(18) Any motor vehicle rented for twenty-eight days or less, which is subject to the tax
imposed by § 32-5B-20;
(19) Any motor vehicle transferred without consideration to any South Dakota nonprofit
organization that is in this state, which:
(a) Is exempt under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and
that will donate (January 1, 2026); and
(b) Donates the motor vehicle to a needy family or individual; and
(20) Any motor vehicle transferred without consideration to any South Dakota nonprofit
organization that is in this state, which:
(a) Is exempt under 26 U.S.C. § 501 (c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and
that sells (January 1, 2026); and
(b) Sells the motor vehicle within forty-five days of the transfer; and
(21) Any motor vehicle owned by nonresident military personnel, as described in § 32-
5-47.1, who:
(a) Is a legal resident of a state other than this state; and
(b) Maintains current registration of the motor vehicle in the other state.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.